test/src/morphology/V-kachchuo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - kaččuo: # Verb 'to watch / katsoa' - full paradigm
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: kačon
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: kačot
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: kaččou
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: kačommo
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: kačotto
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: kačotah
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kačo
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3: kačota
 
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: kačoin
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: kačoit
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: kaččoi
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: kačoimmo
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: kačoitto
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: kačottih
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kaččonuh
      kaččuo+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3: kačottu
      
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg1:  kaččozin
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg2:  kaččozit
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ScSg3:  kaččos
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl1:  kaččozimmo
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl2:  kaččozitto
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ScPl3:  kačottas
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kaččos
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+ScPl3:  kačottas

      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg1:  kaččonuzin
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg2:  kaččonuzit
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ScSg3:  kaččonus
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl1:  kaččonuzimmo
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl2:  kaččonuzitto
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ScPl3:  kačotannus
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg: kaččonus
      kaččuo+V+Cond+Prt+ConNeg+ScPl3:  kačotannus

      kaččuo+V+Pot+ScSg1:  kaččonen
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ScSg2:  kaččonet
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ScSg3:  kaččonou
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ScPl1:  kaččonemmo
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ScPl2:  kaččonetto
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ScPl3:  kačotanneh
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ConNeg: kaččone
      kaččuo+V+Pot+ConNeg+ScPl3:  kačotanne

      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ScSg2:  kačo
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ScSg3:  kaččokkah
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ScPl1:  kaččokkuammo
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ScPl2: [kaččokkua, kaččokkuatto]
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ScPl3:  kačottahes
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg2: kačo
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScSg3: kaččokkah
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl1: kaččokkuammo
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl2: kaččokkua
      kaččuo+V+Imprt+ConNeg+ScPl3: kačottahes

      kaččuo+V+ActPrsPrc+Sg+Nom: kaččoi
      kaččuo+V+ActPrfPrc: kaččonuh
      kaččuo+V+PssPrsPrc: kačottavu
      kaččuo+V+PssPrfPrc: kačottu
      kaččuo+V+Inf: kaččuo
 
 
